Montana, session 2025, HB614.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 76-2-118, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-2-118. Referendum to terminate Termination of zoning district. (1) (a) Real property owners
in a zoning district may petition the board of county commissioners to submit a referendum to the registered
electors residing in the zoning district to terminate the zoning district. The petition must be in writing and contain
the signatures and addresses of 20% or more of the real property owners in the zoning district. The petition
requesting a referendum for the termination of a zoning district must be delivered to the county clerk and
recorder, who shall endorse on it the date when the petition was received and validate the signatures within 60
days of receipt of the petition. If the petition contains valid signatures of at least 20% of the real property owners
within the zoning district, the county clerk and recorder shall notify the county commissioners.
(2)(b) On receipt of a valid petition described in subsection (1)(a), the county commissioners shall
submit the referendum to the registered electors residing in the district in an election conducted pursuant to
Title 13, chapter 1, part 4 or 5.
(3)(c) If the referendum described in subsection (1)(a) and conducted under subsection (2) (1)(b) is
not successful, the real property owners in the zoning district may not bring forth a subsequent referendum
petition for 3 years from the date that the original referendum was submitted to the registered electors pursuant
to subsection (2) (1)(b).
(2) The board of county commissioners may, after providing notice as required in 76-2-106(1) and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 614
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 614
holding a public hearing, pass a resolution to terminate a zoning district if the county:
(a) has decided to comply with the provisions of the Montana Land Use Planning Act under Title
76, chapter 25, using the process specified in 76-25-105; or
(b) has established a larger zoning district pursuant to Title 76, chapter 2, part 2, that
encompasses the land within the zoning district to be terminated."
Section 2. Section 76-2-229, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-2-229. Referendum to terminate Termination of zoning district. (1) (a) Real property owners
in a zoning district may petition the board of county commissioners to submit a referendum to the registered
electors residing in the zoning district to terminate the zoning district. The petition must be in writing and contain
the signatures and addresses of 20% or more of the real property owners in the zoning district. The petition
requesting a referendum for the termination of a zoning district must be delivered to the county clerk and
recorder, who shall endorse on it the date when the petition was received and validate the signatures within 60
days of receipt of the petition. If the petition contains valid signatures of at least 20% of the real property owners
within the zoning district, the county clerk and recorder shall notify the county commissioners.
(2)(b) On receipt of a valid petition described in subsection (1)(a), the county commissioners shall
submit the referendum to the registered electors residing in the district in an election conducted pursuant to
Title 13, chapter 1, part 5.
(c) If the referendum described in subsection (1)(a) and conducted under subsection (1)(b) is not
successful, the real property owners in the zoning district may not bring forth a subsequent referendum petition
for 3 years from the date that the original referendum was submitted to the registered electors pursuant to
subsection (1)(b).
(2) The board of county commissioners may, after providing notice as required in 76-2-205(1) and
holding a public hearing, pass a resolution to terminate a zoning district if the county:
(a) has decided to comply with the provisions of the Montana Land Use Planning Act under Title
76, chapter 25, using the process specified in 76-25-105; or
(b) has established a larger zoning district pursuant to this part that encompasses the land within
the zoning district to be terminated."
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 614
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 614
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 614
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 614, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 614
INTRODUCED BY G. OVERSTREET, F. MANDEVILLE
AN ACT REVISING COUNTY ZONING LAWS; ALLOWING FOR THE TERMINATION OF A ZONING DISTRICT
IF THE COUNTY HAS OPTED INTO THE MONTANA LAND USE PLANNING ACT OR IF THE ZONING
DISTRICT IS TO BE INCLUDED IN ANOTHER ZONING DISTRICT; AND AMENDING SECTIONS 76-2-118
AND 76-2-229, MCA.”